Utah statutes.
53-2b-101.   Title.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Interstate Local Emergency Response Act."

(2)  This part is known as "General Provisions."



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

